South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4520.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 5, Title 7 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 7-5-172. (A) Voter registration must include party affiliation selection. (B) A voter may change his registered party affiliation once annually. (C) Any party affiliation change must be submitted and received at least sixty days prior to any primary in order to be effective for that primary election. SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 13, Title 7 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 7-13-17. (A) All primary elections conducted in this State must be closed primaries. (B) Only voters registered with a political party may be allowed to vote in that party's primary election. (1) Only voters registered as Republicans may be allowed to vote in the Republican Party Primary. (2) Only voters registered as Democrats may be allowed to vote in the Democratic Party Primary. (3) Only voters registered with any other officially recognized political party may be allowed to vote in that party's primary. SECTION 3.  The State Election Commission shall develop and implement procedures necessary to carry out the provisions of this act, including maintaining accurate records of party affiliations and changes to party affiliations. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----